Washington statutes.
RCW 10.88.250

Surrender of person charged with crime committed in state other than demanding state.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the governor of this state may also surrender, on demand of the executive authority of any other state, any person in this state charged in such other state in the manner provided in RCW 10.88.220 with committing an act in this state, or in a third state, intentionally resulting in a crime in the state whose executive authority is making the demand, and the provisions of this chapter not otherwise inconsistent, shall apply to such cases, even though the accused was not in that state at the time of the commission of the crime, and has not fled therefrom.

(2) The governor of this state shall not surrender any person described in subsection (1) of this section where the charge against the person is based on the provision, receipt, attempted provision or receipt, assistance in the provision or receipt, or attempted assistance in the provision or receipt of protected health care services as defined in RCW 7.115.010 that are lawful in the state of Washington.

[ 2023 c 193 s 8; 1971 ex.s. c 46 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 193: See note following RCW 7.115.020.